trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="br/inge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inger</l>     <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inges</l>     <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agte</l>      <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingende</l>   <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/ede__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eder</l>      <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edt</l>       <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edende</l>    <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nævn/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/ære__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ær</l>        <r>ære<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ære</l>       <r>ære<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærer</l>      <r>ære<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æres</l>      <r>ære<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ære<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>året</l>      <r>ære<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærende</l>    <r>ære<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lykke/s__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>snde</l>      <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ide__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ider</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idende</l>    <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sl/ippe__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ip</l>        <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippe</l>      <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipper</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippes</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ap</l>        <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippende</l>   <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="gr/ibe__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ib</l>        <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ibe</l>       <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iber</l>      <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ibes</l>      <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eb</l>        <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebet</l>      <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ibende</l>    <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dø__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/ikke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>        <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikke</l>      <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikker</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkes</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>        <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkende</l>   <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tr/æde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æd</l>        <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æde</l>       <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æder</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ædes</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>       <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ædende</l>    <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="støt/te__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tede</l>      <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tende</l>     <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="afbenytte">       <i>afbenyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="affatte">         <i>affat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afglatte">        <i>afglat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aflytte">         <i>aflyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afmatte">         <i>afmat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afrette">         <i>afret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afslutte">        <i>afslut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anrette">         <i>anret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="babysitte">       <i>babysit</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="benytte">         <i>benyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="berette">         <i>beret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beskatte">        <i>beskat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beskytte">        <i>beskyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beslutte">        <i>beslut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="besmitte">        <i>besmit</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bespotte">        <i>bespot</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cutte">           <i>cut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ensrette">        <i>ensret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flytte">          <i>flyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gætte">           <i>gæt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="henrette">        <i>henret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indberette">      <i>indberet</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indeslutte">      <i>indeslut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indrette">        <i>indret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knytte">          <i>knyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lytte">           <i>lyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="miste">           <i>mis</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mætte">           <i>mæt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omfatte">         <i>omfat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="opfatte">         <i>opfat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oprette">         <i>opret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plette">          <i>plet</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rette">           <i>ret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sammenfatte">     <i>sammenfat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slutte">          <i>slut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smutte">          <i>smut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="splitte">         <i>split</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spætte">          <i>spæt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tilslutte">       <i>tilslut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="udnytte">         <i>udnyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="angribe">         <i>angr</i><par n="gr/ibe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bede">            <i>b</i><par n="b/ede__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bære">            <i>b</i><par n="b/ære__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bide">            <i>b</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begribe">         <i>begr</i><par n="gr/ibe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bestikke">        <i>best</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bringe">          <i>br</i><par n="br/inge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drikke">          <i>dr</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dø">              <i>dø</i><par n="dø__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gribe">           <i>gr</i><par n="gr/ibe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lide">            <i>l</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lykkes">          <i>lykke</i><par n="lykke/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nævne">           <i>nævn</i><par n="nævn/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skære">           <i>sk</i><par n="b/ære__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slippe">          <i>sl</i><par n="sl/ippe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smide">           <i>sm</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stikke">          <i>st</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="støtte">          <i>støt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="træde">           <i>tr</i><par n="tr/æde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trætte">          <i>træt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
